Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 107 Rhode Island Promise Scholarship

16-107-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Promise Scholarship Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1.

16-107-2.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Education is critical for the state’s young people to achieve their dreams and develop their talents;

The state’s economic success depends on a highly educated and skilled workforce; and

The state’s future prosperity depends upon its ability to make educational opportunities beyond high school available for all students as part of a free public education.

In order to address the findings set forth in subsection (a), the purpose of this chapter is to increase the number of students enrolling in and completing degrees on time from the community college of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1.

16-107-3.
Establishment of scholarship program.

Beginning with the high school graduating class of 2017, there is hereby established the Rhode Island promise scholarship program. The general assembly shall annually appropriate the funds necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter. Additional funds beyond the scholarships may be appropriated to support and advance the Rhode Island promise scholarship program. In addition to appropriation by the general assembly, charitable donations may be accepted into the scholarship program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 80, art. 1, § 34; P.L. 2021, ch. 27, § 1, effective May 28, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 28, § 1, effective May 28, 2021.

16-107-4.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“ADA” means the American with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as may be amended from time to time;

“FAFSA” means the Free Application for Federal Student Aid form;

“Mandatory fees and tuition” are the costs that every student is required to pay in order to enroll in classes, and does not include room and board, textbooks, program fees that may exist in some majors, course fees that may exist for some specific courses, meal plans, or travel;

“On track to graduate on time” means the standards determined by the community college of Rhode Island in establishing the expectation of a student to graduate with an associate’s degree within two (2) years of enrollment (recognizing that some students, including students who require developmental education, are double majors, or are enrolled in certain professional programs may require an extended time period for degree completion);

“Reasonable accommodations” means any necessary modifications or adjustment to a facility, equipment, program, or manner of operation as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act (“ADA”) and section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, as may be amended from time to time;

“Recipient student” means a student attending the community college of Rhode Island who qualifies to receive the Rhode Island promise scholarship pursuant to §

16-107-6

;

“Scholarship program” means the Rhode Island promise scholarship program that is established pursuant to §

16-107-3

;

“State” means the state of Rhode Island; and

“Student with a disability” means any student otherwise eligible pursuant to §

16-107-6

who has a physical, developmental, or hidden disability or disabilities, as defined in §

42-87-1

, that would create a hardship or other functional obstacles preventing participation in this program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 27, § 1, effective May 28, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 28, § 1, effective May 28, 2021.

16-107-5.
Administration of scholarship program.

The financial aid office, in conjunction with the office of enrollment management or their respective equivalent offices, at the community college of Rhode Island, shall administer the scholarship program for state residents seeking associate degrees who meet the eligibility requirements in this chapter.

An award of the scholarship program shall cover the cost of two (2) years of tuition and mandatory fees, less federal and all other financial aid monies available to the recipient student. No grant received by students from the College Crusade Scholarship Act as established in chapter 70 of this title shall be considered federal or financial aid for the purposes of this chapter.

The scholarship program is limited to one award per student as required by §

16-107-6(a)(7)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 6, effective June 27, 2022.

16-107-6.
Eligibility for scholarship.

Beginning with the students who enroll at the community college of Rhode Island in the fall of 2017, to be considered for the scholarship, a student:

Must qualify for in-state tuition and fees pursuant to the residency policy adopted by the council on postsecondary education, as amended, supplemented, restated, or otherwise modified from time to time (“residency policy”); provided, that, the student must have satisfied the high school graduation/equivalency diploma condition prior to reaching nineteen (19) years of age; provided, further, that in addition to the option of meeting the requirement by receiving a high school equivalency diploma as described in the residency policy, the student can satisfy the condition by receiving other certificates or documents of equivalent nature from the state or its municipalities as recognized by applicable regulations promulgated by the council on elementary and secondary education;

Must be admitted to, and must enroll and attend the community college of Rhode Island on a full-time basis by the semester immediately following high school graduation or the semester immediately following receipt of a high school equivalency diploma;

Must complete the FAFSA and any required FAFSA verification, or for persons who are legally unable to complete the FAFSA must complete a comparable form created by the community college of Rhode Island, by the deadline prescribed by the community college of Rhode Island for each year in which the student seeks to receive funding under the scholarship program;

Must continue to be enrolled on a full-time basis;

Must maintain an average annual cumulative grade point average (GPA) of 2.5 or greater, as determined by the community college of Rhode Island;

Must remain on track to graduate on time as determined by the community college of Rhode Island;

Must not have already received an award under this scholarship program; and

Must commit to live, work, or continue their education in Rhode Island after graduation.

The community college of Rhode Island shall develop a policy that will secure this commitment from recipient students.

Notwithstanding the eligibility requirements under subsection (a) of this section (“specified conditions”):

In the case of a recipient student who has an approved medical or personal leave of absence or is unable to satisfy one or more specified conditions because of the student’s medical or personal circumstances, the student may continue to receive an award under the scholarship program upon resuming the student’s education so long as the student continues to meet all other applicable eligibility requirements;

In the case of a recipient student who is a member of the national guard or a member of a reserve unit of a branch of the United States military and is unable to satisfy one or more specified conditions because the student is or will be in basic or special military training, or is or will be participating in a deployment of the student’s guard or reserve unit, the student may continue to receive an award under the scholarship program upon completion of the student’s basic or special military training or deployment; and

Any student with a disability, otherwise eligible for a scholarship pursuant to the provisions of this section, as of May 15, 2021, shall be entitled to access this program and shall be afforded all reasonable accommodations, as required by the ADA and the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, including, but not limited to, enrolling on a part-time basis, attaining a high school diploma/GED by age twenty-one (21), and taking longer than two (2) years to graduate with an associate’s degree.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 80, art. 1, § 34; P.L. 2021, ch. 27, § 1, effective May 28, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 28, § 1, effective May 28, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 276, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 277, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

16-107-7.
Reporting and disbursement.

On or before November 10 and May 10 of each fiscal year following fiscal year 2017, the community college of Rhode Island shall submit a report to the director of the office of management and budget, the state budget officer, the house fiscal advisor, the senate fiscal advisor, the commissioner of postsecondary education, and the chair of the council on postsecondary education detailing the number of students eligible to participate in the scholarship program, the amount of federal and institutional financial aid anticipated to be received by recipient students, the aggregate tuition and mandatory fee costs attributable to recipient students, and the resulting total cost of the scholarship program to the state. The report shall contain such data for both the current fiscal year and the most up-to-date forecast for the following fiscal year. Data reported shall be subdivided by student-year cohort and shall be accompanied by a written explanation detailing the estimating methodology utilized and any impact(s) the forecasted data may present to institutional capacity, operational costs, and the tuition/fee revenue base of the institution.

On or before July 1, 2020, the community college of Rhode Island and the commissioner of postsecondary education shall submit a report evaluating the program based on the first two cohorts to the governor, speaker of the house, and the president of the senate. This evaluation shall include the following:

The number of students who started in each cohort;

The number of students in each cohort who have attained a degree or certification in an on-time manner;

The number of students in each cohort who have not attained a degree or certification in an on-time manner and an analysis of why that has happened;

The number of students in each cohort who began the program but have been unable to continue or complete the program and an analysis of why that has happened;

The costs of the program and the costs of continuing the program;

Suggestions for ways to increase the success of the program;

Recommendations as to modifying, continuing, expanding, curtailing, or discontinuing the program; and

Any such other recommendations or information as the community college of Rhode Island and the commissioner of postsecondary education deem appropriate to include in the evaluation.

The office of management and budget, in consultation with the office of the postsecondary commissioner, shall oversee the apportionment and disbursement of all funds appropriated for the purpose of the scholarship program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1.

16-107-8.
Rules and procedures.

The council on postsecondary education is hereby authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and the community college of Rhode Island shall establish appeal procedures for the award, denial, or revocation of funding under the scholarship program. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with §

16-59-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 1.